Hawaii, session 2025, GM1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION I. The legislature finds that access to affordable
2 and reliable irrigation water is essential for sustainable
3 agricultural viability. In the county of Hawaii, farmers incur
4 great expense to pay for potable water from the county during
5 the drier months of the year. By increasing the availability of
6 non-potable water wells for agricultural uses, it would conserve
7 the potable water supply for other purposes.
8 The purpose of this Act is to enhance irrigation water
9 access by appropriating funds to the department of agriculture
10 for a non-potable water wells pilot program to prepare an
11 environmental impact statement or environmental assessment for
12 the drilling of non-potable water wells in Panaewa, Hawaii.
13 SECTION 2. Any non-potable water well or improvement on
14 individual parcels at Panaewa agricultural park and Panaewa farm
15 lots, under the department of agriculture, that is completed
16 according to the environmental impact statement or environmental
2025-3249 HB1365 CDl HMSO 1
niwinmiiHiniiiiiiiiiiHiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
1 assessment under this Act shall revert back to the State upon
2 the lease expiration date.
3 SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
4 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much
5 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for a non-
6 potable water wells pilot program to prepare an environmental
7 impact statement or environmental assessment for the drilling of
8 non-potable water wells on individual parcels at Panaewa
9 agricultural park and Panaewa farm lots, under the department of
10 agriculture.
11 The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
12 agriculture for the purposes of this Act.
13 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3249 HB1365 CDl HMSO 2
■■liiiiniiiiiiinDM

1365
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of June , 2025

HB No. 1365, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1365, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAIH
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
156